Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Home-Generated Medical Sharps Disposal Education Program

§ 49-2-81.
Short title.

Sections 49-2-81 through 49-2-87 shall be known and may be cited as the Home-Generated Medical Sharps Disposal Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 49-2-83.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

Each year, according to the Environmental Protection Agency, more than three billion medical sharps are used by individuals in their homes.

Typically, these medical sharps are put into the household trash, where they become a health hazard for other members of the household and for sanitation workers.

The hazard includes not only the discomfort of a needle-stick injury, but also the risk of contracting an infectious disease from a contaminated medical sharp.

Regulating the disposal of home-generated medical sharps will further the public health and safety of Mississippi residents.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 341, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 49-2-85.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in Sections 49-2-81 through 49-2-87 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Home-generated medical sharp” means a sharp used by an individual at home.

“Medical sharp” means a needle, syringe, lancet or other sharp object used to penetrate the skin for medical testing or for delivery of medication.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 341, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 49-2-87.
Development and implementation of home-generated medical sharps disposal education program.

The department shall develop and implement a statewide educational program designed to inform the public about safe disposal of home-generated medical sharps and to promote the public’s safe disposal of home-generated medical sharps.

The department shall develop the program no later than July 1, 2009, and shall implement the program no later than January 1, 2010.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 341, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2008.